Idaho, session 2025, H0254.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-901, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-901. OFFICIAL ELECTION BALLOT IDENTIFICATION. (1) The county clerk
shall provide that all election ballots are identified as official. Each
ballot shall have upon its face the date and year of the election in which
it is used and the words "Official Election Ballot." To ensure the authen-
ticity of all ballots cast in Idaho elections, each county clerk shall em-
ploy anti-fraud measures as provided in this section. All measures selected
by a county clerk shall be tested and verified before each election, and the
county clerk shall notify the county board of canvassers which measures are
being used for each election. The confidentiality of each voter's choices
shall be maintained in accordance with section 1, article VI of the constitu-
tion of the state of Idaho, which guarantees the absolute secrecy of all bal-
lots.
(2) The clerk in a county that utilizes optical scan ballots shall en-
sure that:
(a) The official election ballot identification is printed on each bal-
lot issued; and
(b) Each ballot contains a unique marking to prevent duplication of of-
ficial election ballots.
(3) The clerk in a county that utilizes paper or other ballots shall
provide an official election stamp of such character or device and of such
material as the board of county commissioners may select. In the event such
stamp is lost, destroyed or unavailable upon election day, the distributing
clerk shall initial each ballot and write "stamped" upon the ballot in the
appropriate place.
(2) For counties using voting machines as provided in chapter 24, title
34, Idaho Code, the county clerk shall use at least two (2) of the following
anti-fraud measures on all ballots prior to being issued to the voter:
(a) Assignment of a unique identifier to each ballot in the form of a
barcode or quick response code. The unique identifiers shall be ran-
domly generated and non-sequential such that the identifier is never
associated with the identity of the voter. The unique identifier shall
be assigned to the ballot prior to being submitted to a scanner or tabu-
lator;
(b) Printing of ballots on watermarked paper or display of a unique wa-
termark image on each ballot;


(c) Printing of a hologram design on each ballot that is unique to each
election. The hologram design shall be such that if a ballot is copied,
the hologram design will change and not match the original;
(d) Printing of ballots on security paper such that, if copied, the copy
will display that it is a copy and not the original; or
(e) Stamping or printing of the words "Official Election Ballot" on
each ballot at the time it is issued to the voter.
(3) For counties hand counting the tally of votes, each ballot shall,
at the time it is issued to the voter, be stamped or have printed the words
"Official Election Ballot" along with the date of the election.
(4) The clerk shall maintain documentation of the security measures
taken and the chain of custody of all ballots.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.